Louisiana, session 2026, SB187.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:751 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 48:752.1, 753.1,
and 756.1 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§751. Parish transportation
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund to be
designated the "Parish Transportation Fund" to consist of the funds and to be used
for the purposes hereinafter provided in this Part.
B. There is hereby established within the Parish Transportation Fund
the "Oil and Gas Severance Subfund" to consist of the funds and to be used for
the purposes hereinafter provided for in R.S. 48:753.1.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-306 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 187
* * *
§752.1. Composition of the Oil and Gas Severance Subfund
The state treasurer shall credit to the Oil and Gas Severance Subfund of
the Parish Transportation Fund created by R.S. 48:751 the following:
(1) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2026, and each fiscal year
thereafter, no less than five percent of the total avails from state severance taxes
on oil and gas as provided for in R.S. 47:633.
(2) All monies made available from funds annually appropriated by the
legislature.
* * *
§753.1. Use of Oil and Gas Severance Subfund
The monies in the Oil and Gas Severance Subfund shall be used:
(1) To restore and maintain public roads and bridges within a parish
that facilitates operations and activities associated with the oil and gas industry.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Part, under no
circumstances shall funds deposited into the Oil and Gas Severance Subfund be
utilized by any parish to secure or provide for bond issuances.
* * *
§756.1. Distribution formula of the Oil and Gas Severance Subfund
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Part, the monies in the Oil
and Gas Severance Subfund shall be distributed on a pro-rata basis to the
parishes subject to the limitations of Article VII, Section 4(D)(3) of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026, whichever is later.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-306 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 187